District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-419

Financial inability to pay for blood test or required statement

Repealed.

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 959, Pub. L. 89-682, § 4
Sept. 11, 2008, D.C. Law 17-222, § 3(c), 55 DCR 8295
1981 Ed., § 30-119.
1973 Ed., § 30-121.